Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2303
Process; costs; payment by county.

In any civil or criminal case in which a party is permitted to proceed in forma pauperis, the court shall direct that the expense of process by publication, if such process is required by the court, be paid by the county in the same manner as other claims are paid.

Laws 1972, LB 1120, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 689, § 6.